Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB145.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 64 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any provision of KRS Chapter 18A, KRS 41.060 or 64.640, or other
law to the contrary, the State Treasurer, Auditor of Public Accounts, Secretary of State,
Commissioner of Agriculture, or Attorney General may:
(1) Employ persons exempt from the classified service deemed necessary or advisable
for making and carrying out policy; and
(2) Increase by administrative order the salary of any classified employee with status
up to the midpoint of the grade for the employee's classification.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 11/17/2025 7:32 AM Jacketed